Arkansas, session 2025, HB1671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Sales to qualified nonprofit organization — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "qualified nonprofit organization" means
an organization described in 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as it existed on January
1, 2025, that:
(1) Has an annual operating budget of less than two hundred
thousand dollars ($200,000); and
(2) Performs charitable community-based services in the state to
benefit residents of the state that are in need of assistance.
(b) The gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of
tangible personal property, specified digital products, a digital code, or
services are exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by this chapter and
the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949,
*CEB024*
04-14-2025 09:14:29 CEB024

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 H4/14/25 HB1671
§ 26-53-101 et seq., if:
(1) The sale is made to a qualified nonprofit organization; and
(2) If the sale is of tangible personal property, the tangible
personal property sold to the qualified nonprofit organization is not:
(A) A motor vehicle;
(B) A motorboat;
(C) An aircraft or airplane;
(D) An alcoholic beverage;
(E) Tobacco;
(F) A computer;
(G) A material used to construct a residential or
commercial structure;
(H) A household appliance;
(I) A mobile telephone or cellular telephone;
(J) An all-terrain vehicle; or
(K) A television.
(c) A nonprofit organization requesting recognition as a qualified
nonprofit organization shall file with the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration an application as prescribed by the secretary
verifying the facts upon which the nonprofit organization claims the
exemption under this section.
(d)(1) Upon receipt of an application described in subsection (c) of
this section, the secretary shall respond in writing within a reasonable time
after the filing of the application either issuing an exemption certificate
to the qualified nonprofit organization or denying the application.
(2) If an application is denied, an explanation of the reason
for denial shall accompany the denial.
(3) If the secretary finds that a nonprofit organization no
longer meets the conditions to be a qualified nonprofit organization, the
secretary shall revoke an exemption certificate.
(e) The secretary may promulgate rules to implement this section,
including but not limited to rules regarding:
(1) An application process; and
(2) A reverification process.
(f) The secretary shall report annually to the Legislative Council the
number of exemption certificates that have been issued to qualified nonprofit
04-14-2025 09:14:29 CEB024

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 H4/14/25 HB1671
organizations during the prior one (1) year period.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.

/s/L. Johnson






























04-14-2025 09:14:29 CEB024